Connecticut, session 2026, HB05528.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Subsection (e) of section 1-205 of the general statutes is
2 repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
3 1, 2026):
4 (e) (1) The Freedom of Information Commission shall conduct
5 training sessions, at least annually, for members of public agencies for
6 the purpose of educating such members as to the requirements of this
7 section and sections [1-7 to 1-14, inclusive, 1-16 to 1-18, inclusive,] 1-200
8 to 1-202, inclusive, [1-205] 1-205a, 1-206, 1-210 to [1-217] 1-219, inclusive,
9 1-225 to 1-232, inclusive, and 1-240 [, 1-241 and 19a-342] to 1-242,
10 inclusive.
11 (2) On and after October 1, 2026, each member of a public agency shall
12 complete such training. Each member employed on October 1, 2026,
HB5528 / File No. 545 1

HB5528 File No. 545
13 shall complete such training not later than March 1, 2027, and any
14 member hired after October 1, 2026, shall complete such training not less
15 than six months after commencing employment. The commission may
16 create a videorecording or digital recording for purposes of offering
17 such training.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 1-205(e)
GAE Joint Favorable
HB5528 / File No. 545 2

HB5528 File No. 545
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Various State Agencies GF - Potential See Below See Below
Cost
Note: GF=General Fund
Municipal Impact:
Municipalities Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Various Municipalities Potential See Below See Below
Cost
Explanation
The bill requires that all state and applicable municipal employees
complete Freedom of Information Act (FOIA) training offered by the
Freedom of Information Commission (FOIC), resulting in a potential
cost to various state agencies and municipalities beginning in FY 27.
There is a potential cost to the extent that state and applicable
municipal employees will need coverage while completing the FOIC
Training. The exact cost will depend on the number of essential
employees requiring coverage, the duration of the training, and the pay
rates for those covering them. Costs will be reduced in FY 28 as only
new employees will need to undergo training; current employees must
complete training in FY 27.
The bill additionally requires that FOIC update training standards,
which has no impact, as FOIC has sufficient expertise to adjust its
training material.
HB5528 / File No. 545 3

HB5528 File No. 545
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future subject to wage inflation.
HB5528 / File No. 545 4

HB5528 File No. 545
OLR Bill Analysis
HB 5528
AN ACT REQUIRING PUBLIC AGENCY EMPLOYEES TO ATTEND
FREEDOM OF INFORMATION ACT TRAINING.